Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 4
AMENDMENT OF ARTICLES AND BYLAWS OF
LIMITED COOPERATIVE ASSOCIATIONS

7-58-401. Authority to amend articles and bylaws.

A limited cooperative association may amend its articles and bylaws under this part 4 for any lawful purpose. In addition, the initial board of directors may amend the bylaws of an association under section 7-58-304.

Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, a member does not have a vested property right resulting from any provision in the articles or bylaws, including a provision relating to the management, control, capital structure, distribution, entitlement, purpose, or duration of the limited cooperative association.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 774, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-402. Notice and action on amendment of articles and bylaws.

Except as provided in this subsection (1) and section 7-58-405 (6), the articles and bylaws of a limited cooperative association may be amended only at a members meeting. An amendment requiring membership approval may be proposed by either:

A majority of the board of directors, or a greater percentage if required by the articles or bylaws; or

One or more petitions signed by at least ten percent of the patron members or at least ten percent of the investor members.

The board of directors shall call a members meeting to consider an amendment proposed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The meeting shall be held not later than ninety days following the proposal of the amendment by the board or receipt of a petition or petitions satisfying the requirements of this section. The board shall mail or otherwise transmit or deliver in a record to each member:

The proposed amendment, or a summary of the proposed amendment and a statement of the manner in which a copy of the amendment in a record may be reasonably obtained by a member;

A recommendation that the members approve the amendment, or, if the board determines that because of conflict of interest or any other reason it should not make a favorable recommendation, the basis for that determination;

A statement of any condition of the board's submission of the amendment to the members; and

Notice of the meeting at which the proposed amendment will be considered, which shall be given in the same manner as notice for a special meeting of members.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 774, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-403. Method of voting on amendment of articles and bylaws.

A substantive change to a proposed amendment of the articles or bylaws may not be made at the members meeting at which a vote on the amendment occurs.

A nonsubstantive change to a proposed amendment of the articles or bylaws may be made at the members meeting at which the vote on the amendment occurs and need not be separately voted upon by the board of directors.

A vote to adopt a nonsubstantive change to a proposed amendment to the articles or bylaws shall be by the same percentage of votes required to pass a proposed amendment.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 775, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-404. Voting by district, class, or voting group.

This section applies if the articles or bylaws provide for voting by district or class, or if there is one or more identifiable voting groups that a proposed amendment to the articles or bylaws would affect differently from other members with respect to matters identified in section 7-58-405 (1). Approval of the amendment requires the same percentage of votes of the members of that district, class, or voting group required in sections 7-58-405 and 7-58-514.

If a proposed amendment to the articles or bylaws would affect members in two or more districts or classes entitled to vote separately under subsection (1) of this section in the same or a substantially similar way, the districts or classes affected shall vote as a single voting group unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide for separate voting.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 775, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-405. Approval of amendment.

Subject to section 7-58-404 and subsections (3) and (4) of this section, an amendment to the articles must be approved by:

At least a majority vote of the voting power of all members present at a members meeting called under section 7-58-402, unless the articles require a greater percentage; and

If the limited cooperative association has investor members, at least a majority of the votes cast by patron members, unless the articles require a greater percentage vote by patron members.

Subject to section 7-58-404 and subsections (3), (4), (5), and (6) of this section, an amendment to the bylaws must be approved by:

At least a majority vote of the voting power of all members present at a members meeting called under section 7-58-402, unless the articles or bylaws require a greater percentage; and

If a limited cooperative association has investor members, a majority of the votes cast by patron members, unless the articles or bylaws require a larger affirmative vote by patron members.

The articles may require that the percentage of votes required under paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section, or the articles or bylaws may require that the percentage of votes required under paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section, be:

A different percentage that is not less than a majority of members voting at the meeting;

Measured against the voting power of all members; or

A combination of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (3).

Consent in a record by a member shall be delivered to a limited cooperative association before delivery of an amendment to the articles or restated articles for filing pursuant to section 7-58-407, or before or at the same time as a members vote is taken on an amendment to the bylaws or adoption of restated bylaws submitted to members for a vote, if, as a result of the amendment or restatement:

The member will have:

Personal liability for an obligation of the association; or

An obligation or liability for an additional contribution; or

The relative rights of the member in the association will be adversely affected or diminished by the amendment.

The vote required to amend bylaws must satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) of this section if the proposed amendment modifies:

The equity capital structure of the limited cooperative association, including the rights of the association's members to share in profits or distributions, or the relative rights, preferences, and restrictions granted to or imposed upon one or more districts, classes, or voting groups of similarly situated members;

The transferability of a member's interest;

The manner or method of allocation of profits or losses among members;

The quorum for a meeting and the rights of voting and governance; or

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, the terms for admission of new members.

Except for the matters described in subsection (5) of this section, the articles may delegate amendment of all or a part of the bylaws to the board of directors without requiring member approval.

If the articles delegate amendment of bylaws to the board of directors, the board shall provide a description of any amendment of the bylaws made by the board to the members in a record not later than thirty days after the amendment, but the description may be provided at the next annual members meeting if the meeting is held within the thirty-day period.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 775, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-406. Restated articles.

The board of directors may restate the articles at any time with or without action by the members. If the limited cooperative association does not have both members and directors, its organizers may restate the articles at any time.

The restatement may include one or more amendments to the articles. If the restatement includes an amendment requiring approval of the members, it must be approved in the same manner as an amendment to the articles under section 7-58-405 (1).

If the board of directors submits a restatement for action by the members, the board shall call a meeting of members and mail or otherwise transmit or deliver in a record the information and give notice of the meeting in accordance with section 7-58-402 (2) to each member entitled to vote on the restatement. The copy of the restatement provided to members must identify any amendment or other change the restatement would make in the articles.

A limited cooperative association restating its articles shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of restatement stating:

The domestic entity name of the association;

The text of the restated articles; and

If the restatement was adopted by the board of directors or organizers without member action, a statement to that effect and that member action was not required.

Upon filing by the secretary of state or at any later effective date determined pursuant to section 7-90-304, restated articles supersede the original articles and all prior amendments to them.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 777, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-407. Amendment of articles - filing.

A limited cooperative association amending its articles shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of amendment stating:

The domestic name of the association; and

The text of each amendment adopted.

Before the beginning of the initial meeting of the board of directors, an organizer who knows that information in the filed articles was inaccurate when the articles were filed or has become inaccurate due to changed circumstances shall promptly:

Cause the articles to be amended; and

If appropriate, deliver a statement of:

Change to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to section 7-90-305.5; or

Correction to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to section 7-90-305.

Upon filing, an amendment of the articles that has been properly adopted by the members is effective as provided in section 7-90-304.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 778, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.